en: Frozen cooked broccoli
fr: Brocoli surgelé cuit

en: Frozen mashed broccolis
fr: Purée de brocoli surgelée

en: Brussels sprouts
bg: Брюкселско зеле
de: Rosenkohl
es: Coles de Bruselas
fi: brysselinkaalit
fr: Choux de Bruxelles
hr: Prokulice
it: Cavoletti di Bruxelles, Cavolini di Bruxelles
ja: メキャベツ, 芽キャベツ
la: Brassica oleracea var. gemmifera
nl: Spruiten

en: Fresh Brussels sprouts
de: Frischer Rosenkohl
es: Coles de Bruselas frescas
fr: Choux de Bruxelles frais
hr: Svježe prokulice

en: Cabbages
bg: Зеле
de: Kohl
es: Repollos, Col repollo
fi: Kaalit
fr: Choux cabus
hr: Kupusnjače
ja: キャベツ
la: Brassica oleracea var. capitata
lv: Kāposti
nl: Kolen
pl: Kapusta, Kapusty

en: Pointed cabbages, Pointed cabbage
de: Spitzkohl
fr: Choux pointus, Chou pointu

en: White cabbage, white cabbage
bg: Бяло зеле
fr: Chou blanc
hr: Bijeli kupus
pl: Kapusta biała, Kapusty białe

en: Canned white cabbage
fr: Choux blancs en conserve, chou blanc en conserve

en: Green cabbage
bg: Зелено зеле
fr: Chou vert
hr: Zeleni kupus

en: Boiled green cabbage, Green cabbage cooked in water
fr: Chou vert boulli, Chou vert cuit à l'eau

en: Canned green cabbage
fr: Choux verts en conserve, Chou vert en conserve

en: Red cabbage
bg: Червено зеле
de: Rotkraut
es: Lombardas, Lombarda, Col lombarda
fi: punakaali
fr: Chou rouge, Choux rouges
hr: Crveni kupus
ja: 赤キャベツ, 紫キャベツ
nl: Rode kolen
pl: Kapusta czerwona, Kapusty czerwone

en: Fresh red cabbage
es: Lombarda fresca
fr: Choux rouges frais
hr: Svježi crveni kupus

en: Red cabbage with apple
nl: Rode kolen met appel

en: Boiled red cabbage, Red cabbage cooked in water
fr: Chou rouge boulli, Chou rouge cuit à l'eau
hr: Kuhani crveni kupus
pl: Kapusta czerwona gotowana, Kapusty czerwone gotowane

en: Canned red cabbage
fr: Choux rouges en conserve, Chou rouge en conserve

en: Kohlrabi, Cabbage turnips
fr: Chou-rave
hr: Korabice
ja: コールラビ
pl: Kalarepa, Kalarepy

en: Boiled kohlrabi, Kohlrabi cooked in water
fr: Chou-rave bouilli, Chou-rave cuit à l'eau

en: Bok choy, pak choi, pok choi
de: Pak Choi, Pak Choy, Chinesischer Senfkohl
es: Bok choy, Pak choi
fr: Pak choï, pak-choi, pé-tsai
hr: Bok choy
it: Bok choy, Pak-choi, Cavolo cinese
la: Brassica rapa subsp. chinensis
nl: Paksoi, Pak-choi

en: Chinese cabbage, nappa cabbage
bg: Китайско зеле
fr: Choux chinois, Choux pe-tsaï
hr: Kineski kupus
ja: 白菜, ハクサイ
nl: Chinese kolen, Chinese kool
pl: Kapusta pekińska, Kapusty pekińskie